Washington statutes.
RCW 35.106.100

Chapter supersedes and preempts local laws—Application of RCW 35.106.020 to local laws.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances of all local governments regarding the same subject matter. The state preemption created in this section applies to all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, and ordinances pertaining to crime-free rental housing programs at any time.

(2) RCW 35.106.020 does not apply to rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances adopted by local governments prior to July 1, 2010, except as required by an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to litigation regarding the rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances.

[ 2010 c 132 s 5.]